Idaho, session 2025, H0441.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-1004, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1004. MARKING AND FOLDING OF ABSENTEE BALLOT -- AFFIDAVIT ENVELOPE
-- RETURN ENVELOPE. (1) Upon receipt of the absent elector's ballot, the
elector shall thereupon mark and fold the ballot so as to conceal the mark-
ing, deposit it in the secret ballot envelope and seal the envelope securely.
In the event an election requires a perforated ballot, the unvoted portion
must be deposited in the unvoted ballot envelope and sealed. The ballot en-
velopes must then be deposited in the return or affidavit envelope and sealed
securely.
(2) The elector shall then legibly write the elector's driver's license
or state identification card number, if such information exists, the last
four (4) digits of the elector's social security number, and the elector's
date of birth, and execute an affidavit on the back of the return envelope in
the form prescribed,; provided however, that such affidavit need not be no-
tarized. The secretary of state shall prescribe a system or systems in which
the elector's completed ballot is sealed within its own secret ballot enve-
lope, and the elector's driver's license or state identification card num-
ber, the last four (4) digits of the elector's social security number, the
elector's date of birth, and the affidavit signature are not visible on the
outside of the sealed return envelope.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-1005, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 10, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-1005, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-1005. RETURN OF ABSENTEE BALLOT. (1) The return envelope shall be
mailed or delivered to the officer who issued the same; provided, that an ab-
sentee ballot must be received by the issuing officer by 8:00 p.m. on the day
of election before such ballot may be counted.


(2) Upon receipt of an absent elector's ballot, the county clerk of the
county wherein such elector resides shall open the return envelope and:
(a) Verify the authenticity of the affidavit, including verifying that
the signature matches the signature from such elector's voter registra-
tion;
(b) Verify, for every data element for which the county clerk has match-
able data for the elector, the elector's driver's license or state is-
sued identification number, last four (4) digits of the elector's so-
cial security number, and the elector's date of birth; and
(c) Shall write or stamp on the envelope containing the same, the date
and hour such envelope was received in his office and shall record the
information pursuant to section 34-1011, Idaho Code.
(3) For counties with a central count ballot processing center, the
county clerk may then open the return envelope and affidavit envelope, if
any, of the verified absentee ballot and remove the sealed secret ballot
envelope. Except as provided in this section, the county clerk shall safely
keep and preserve all absent electors' ballots unopened until the time pre-
scribed for delivery to the polls or to the central count ballot processing
center.
SECTION 4. That Section 34-1008, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1008. DEPOSIT OF ABSENTEE BALLOTS. Between the opening and closing
of the polls on such election day the judges of election of such precinct
shall open the carrier envelope only, announce the absent elector's name,
and in the event they find such applicant to be a duly registered elector of
the precinct and that he has not heretofore voted at the election, they shall
open the return or affidavit envelope and remove the sealed secret ballot en-
velopes and deposit the same in the proper ballot boxes and cause the absent
elector's name to be entered on the poll books the same as though he had been
present and voted in person. The sealed secret ballot envelope shall not be
opened until the ballots are counted.
SECTION 5. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2026.